Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.395

Assault weapons—Consumer protection act.

(1) The legislature finds that manufacturing, importing, distributing, selling, or offering for sale any assault weapon in violation of RCW 9.41.390 are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW; are not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business; and constitutes an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2) A violation of RCW 9.41.390 is an unfair or deceptive act or practice or unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce for purposes of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(3) Any person or entity that receives a civil investigative demand issued pursuant to RCW 19.86.110 and that has an objection to answering in whole or in part may avail themselves of the procedural protections afforded in RCW 19.86.110(8). Further, the attorney general shall not share with a law enforcement agency conducting a criminal investigation any materials or information obtained via a response to a civil investigative demand issued pursuant to RCW 19.86.110 unless such information or materials are required to be disclosed pursuant to issuance of a search warrant.

[ 2023 c 162 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2023 c 162: See notes following RCW 9.41.390.